Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 3. Miscellaneous Fees; Taxidermists; Trapping; Fur Dealers

§ 23-2-301.
Miscellaneous
fees; verification of residency required.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 92, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 124, § 3.

The following licenses and tags may be purchased for the fee indicated in addition to the applicable fee under W.S.

23-1-701

and subject to other requirements of this article:

Resident trapping license-furbearing . . . . . $43.00

License to capture furbearing animals for domestication . . . . . $19.00

Resident fur dealer’s license . . . . . $52.00

Nonresident fur dealer’s license . . . . . $283.00

Taxidermist’s license . . . . . $67.00

Nonresident taxidermist’s license . . . . . $721.00

Game bird farm license . . . . . $134.00

Fishing preserve license . . . . . $134.00

Commercial fish hatchery license . . . . . $185.00

License to seine or trap fish . . . . . $19.00

License to deal in live bait . . . . . $67.00

Nonresident trapping license- furbearing . . . . . $247.00

Resident youth trapping license (residents under the age of seventeen
(17) years of age) . . . . . $6.00

Pioneer resident trapping license-furbearing (residents aged sixty-five (65) years of age or older, who have resided in Wyoming for thirty (30) years) . . . . . $20.00

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 34; 1943, ch. 112, § 6; 1945, ch. 84, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 47-207; Laws 1946, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 1; 1949, ch. 90, § 1; 1951, ch. 71, § 1; 1955, ch. 117, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23-86; Laws 1959, ch. 196, § 1; 1961, ch. 162, §§ 1, 2; 1965, ch. 132, § 1; ch. 147, § 1; ch. 184, § 3; 1969, ch. 31, § 1; ch. 75, § 1; ch. 129, §§ 8, 9; 1971, ch. 28, § 1; ch. 199, § 1; ch. 233, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-44; Laws 1978, ch. 30, § 1; 1979, ch. 29, § 1; 1987, ch. 156, § 2; 1989, ch. 24, § 1; 1991, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1996, ch. 121, § 2; 1999, ch. 92, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 99, § 1; 2003, ch. 144, § 1; 2004, ch. 36, § 1; ch. 124, § 3; 2007, ch. 2, § 1; 2017 ch. 159, § 1, effective January 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 95, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2003 amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective January 1, 2004, deleted “Effective January 1, 2000” from the beginning of (c); and increased the fees set out in (c)(i), (iii) through (ix), (xi), and (xii).

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 36, § 1, effective January 1, 2005, inserted “in addition to the applicable fee under W.S.

23-1-701

” in (c).

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 124, § 13, effective January 1, 2005, by repealed (b), pertaining to proof of residency.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2007 amendments. —

The 2007 amendment, effective January 1, 2008,
changed dollar amounts for miscellaneous license fees in (c)(i) through (c)(xii).

The 2017 amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective Jan. 1, 2018, rewrote (c)(i) through (c)(xii), by amending hunting and trapping license fees.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 95, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, added (c)(xiv).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, added "$" preceding the dollar values throughout (c).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), see § 23-1-102(a)(xiii).

§ 23-2-302.
Taxidermist’s license; bond; game specimens must be tagged; records.

Any person who conducts business for the purpose of mounting, preserving or preparing wildlife specimens shall apply for and receive a taxidermist’s license upon payment of the proper fee prior to receiving wildlife specimens.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 42, § 2.

Licensed taxidermists and persons shipping wildlife specimens to, or receiving wildlife specimens from, a licensed taxidermists are exempt from the requirements of W.S. 23-3-106(a) and (b).

A licensed taxidermist shall maintain records of wildlife specimens received. Those records shall be available for a regulatory inspection upon a forty-eight (48) hour notification by the department. The records shall be submitted to the department by January 31 each year for the preceding year.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 41; C.S. 1945, § 47-214; W.S. 1957, § 23-61; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-45; 2007, ch. 62, § 1; 2014 ch. 42, §§ 1, 2, effective March 7, 2014.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “an 11th degree misdemeanor” in (c).

The 2014 amendment,

in (a), substituted “person who conducts business for the purpose of mounting, preserving or preparing wildlife specimens shall apply” for “qualified person may apply” and added “prior to receiving wildlife specimens” following “proper fee”; and added (e) and (f); and repealed former (b) through (d) which read:

“(b) Before a taxidermist's license is issued, the applicant shall post a surety or cash bond with the department in an amount determined by the commission conditioned to the effect that the taxidermist shall complete his work within a reasonable time and promptly upon completion and payment of fee return the specimen to the client.

“(c) No person shall deliver to any taxidermist, nor shall any taxidermist receive any game specimen unless tagged with a Wyoming game tag except as otherwise provided. Violation of this subsection constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in
W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

“(d) Taxidermists, by keeping records required by the commission, may receive, purchase, store, handle, ship, sell, transport, and deliver any hide from cloven hoof big game animals, either within or without Wyoming, without tagging the hide with a Wyoming game tag.”

Laws 2014, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, §
8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2014.

§ 23-2-303.
Trapping licenses; tagging; traps and snares; penalty; confiscation; inspection; interference with trapping.

Any person may, in the discretion of the department upon application and the payment of the proper fee, receive a license to trap any furbearing animal. The department shall issue a trapping license to a nonresident only if his state issues licenses to Wyoming residents to trap the same species for which residents of that state may be licensed to trap in that state. Any nonresident applying for a Wyoming trapping license shall furnish:

A notarized affidavit stating the applicant’s legal address including his state of residence; and

A copy of the most current statutes or rules and regulations of the applicant’s state of residence which show that the state issues nonresident trapping licenses which authorize Wyoming residents to trap the same species for which residents of that state may be licensed to trap in that state.

At the time of application for a trapping license, the department shall determine:

The area in the district where the trapper may take furbearing animals;

Allowable harvests of furbearing animals within designated areas which may be taken in a given time.

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 156, § 2.

The commission, following consultation with other affected entities, may promulgate rules and regulations establishing specifications for snares, breakaway weights, location of breakaway devices, loop size and anchors for trapping and snaring of furbearing and predatory animals. All traps and snares used for furbearing or predatory animals shall be permanently marked or tagged with the name and address of the owner or the identification number assigned to the owner by the department. Any identification number attached to a trap or snare pursuant to this subsection is solely for the use of the department or appropriate law enforcement officers and is not a public record for purposes of W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

. No trap or snare shall be set for furbearing or predatory animals within thirty (30) feet of any exposed bait or carcass over five (5) pounds in weight. As used in this subsection, “exposed bait or carcass” means the meat or viscera of any part of a mammal, bird or fish, excluding dried bones. All snares used for taking furbearing or predatory animals shall be equipped with a break-away device. Unless otherwise specified in this subsection, all steel-jawed leghold traps shall be checked by the owner at least once during each seventy-two (72) hour period unless extensions are granted by the department. All snares and quick kill body grip traps shall be checked by the owner not less than once each week unless extensions are granted by the department. All wildlife caught in any trap or snare shall upon discovery, be removed immediately by the owner. Violation of this subsection constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

After the date gray wolves are removed from the list of experimental nonessential population, endangered species or threatened species in Wyoming as provided by W.S.

23-1-108

the commission may enact rules and regulations setting forth the specifications for traps and snares used for the taking of gray wolves and the time period for checking such traps and snares. Except as otherwise provided by commission rule, the provisions in this section regulating the trapping of furbearing and predatory animals shall apply to the trapping of gray wolves.

Any trap or snare found in the field not bearing the name and address of the owner of the trap or snare or the identification number assigned by the department to the owner of the trap or snare may be confiscated by any employee of the department. Any landowner or his agent may inspect any trap or snare set on his property, may remove the trap or snare and may release or remove from the trap or snare any wildlife which has not been taken lawfully. The landowner or his agent shall notify the department of any such wildlife, excluding predatory animals, as soon as practicably possible after removing the wildlife from a trap or snare.

A violation of this subsection constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v). Except as otherwise provided in this section, no person shall intentionally:

Tamper with or remove a trap or snare set and maintained in compliance with this act; or

Release or remove a furbearer or predator from a trap or snare set and maintained in compliance with this act.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 81; C.S. 1945, § 47-519; W.S. 1957, § 23-64; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-46; Laws 1977, ch. 112, § 1; 1978, ch. 30, § 1; 1987, ch. 156, § 2; 1989, ch. 242, § 1; 2001, ch. 77, § 1; 2003, ch. 115, § 2; 2004, ch. 53, § 1; 2007, ch. 62, § 1; 2009, ch. 27, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to trapping devices prohibited, see §

23-3-304

.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added the last two sentences in (e); and added (f).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “ninth degree misdemeanor” in (d); substituted “low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “7th degree misdemeanor as specified under W.S. 23-6-202(a)(vii)” in the introductory language in (f).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (d) by adding the first sentence, and changing the descriptions of snares and traps and the times to check them; added subsection designation (e); redesignated former (e) and (f) as (f) and (g); substituted “as soon as practicably possible after” for “prior to” in (f).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 27, § 2 provides: “The commission shall adopt final rules to implement this act not later than July 1, 2009.”

§ 23-2-304.
Fur dealers; licenses; hides; tagging.

Any person who desires to engage in the business of buying, collecting, selling, or shipping raw furs other than hides from cloven hoof big game animals shall apply for and pay to the department the proper fee for a resident fur dealer’s license or a nonresident fur dealer’s license prior to commencing the business.

Fur dealers may receive, purchase, store, handle, ship, sell, transport, and deliver hides from cloven hoof big game animals either within or without the state without tagging the hides with a Wyoming game tag so long as proper records are kept.

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 156, § 2.

Fur dealers bringing hides or furs into Wyoming lawfully obtained in another state shall not remove any tag, tattoo mark, or other identification attached to or placed upon the hide or fur by the authorities of another state.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 43; 1943, ch. 112, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 47-216; W.S. 1957, § 23-63; Laws 1957, ch. 179, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-47; Laws 1987, ch. 156, § 2.

§ 23-2-305.
Capture of furbearing animals for domestication; license; fee.

Any resident person who desires to capture furbearing animals for domestication or propagation shall apply for and pay to the department the proper fee for a license to capture furbearing animals for the purposes of domestication or propagation. The department may issue the license under such restrictions as it deems necessary.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-48.

§ 23-2-306.
Conservation stamp; exemptions.

Subject to subsections (b), (c) and (d) of this section and the applicable fee under W.S.

23-1-701

, each sportsman licensed under W.S.

23-2-101

,

23-2-107

or

23-2-201

shall purchase a single conservation stamp for twenty-one dollars ($21.00) which shall be valid for the time period specified in commission rules not to exceed twelve (12) months. The stamp or an authorization signifying purchase of the stamp shall be in the possession of any person exercising rights under any fishing or hunting license issued pursuant to W.S.

23-2-101

,

23-2-107

or

23-2-201

. Holders of special limited fishing permits issued under W.S.

23-2-207

and holders of licenses only under W.S. 23-1-302(q), 23-2-101(j)(v) and (vi), 23-2-201(d)(vi), (vii) and (ix), 23-2-201(f) and 23-2-201(g) are exempt from the provisions of this section when exercising hunting or fishing privileges provided under those specific licenses. Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, revenues collected from the sale of each stamp under this subsection shall be deposited as follows:

Twenty-five percent (25%) of the revenues collected under this subsection into the account created under W.S. 23-1-501(e);

Of the amount remaining:

Fifty percent (50%) into the trust account created under W.S. 23-1-501(f); and

Fifty percent (50%) into the game and fish fund.

A lifetime conservation stamp may be purchased for one hundred eighty-five dollars ($185.00) plus the applicable fee under W.S.

23-1-701

. Revenues collected from the sale of each stamp under this subsection shall be deposited as follows:

Fifty percent (50%) into the trust account created under W.S. 23-1-501(f); and

Fifty percent (50%) into the account created under W.S. 23-1-501(e).

Holders of licenses issued under W.S. 23-1-705(d), (e) or (k) are exempt from the provisions of this section when exercising any hunting or fishing privileges licensed under this act. Licenses issued under W.S. 23-1-705(d), (e) or (k) shall be in possession of the person exempted under this subsection when exercising any hunting or fishing privilege licensed under this act.

In addition to other fees under this section, persons applying for a conservation stamp or a lifetime conservation stamp under this section may pay any whole dollar amount to support wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system. The department shall provide information on the application form specifying that the applicant may pay the contribution under this subsection. Funds collected under this subsection shall be transmitted to the state treasurer to be credited to the wildlife conservation account created by W.S. 31-2-231(b). The department shall deduct and retain an amount equal to the administrative costs incurred in complying with this subsection.

Of the twenty-one dollars ($21.00) collected under subsection (a) of this section, nine dollars ($9.00) collected from the sale of each stamp shall be deposited into the account created under W.S. 23-1-501(h).

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 175, § 1; 1985, ch. 166, § 1; 1986, ch. 69, § 1; 1988, ch. 29, § 2; 1989, ch. 23, § 2; 1996, ch. 121, § 2; 1997, ch. 16, § 1; 1999, ch. 92, § 1; 2000, ch. 63, § 1; 2003, ch. 71, § 1; ch. 195, § 1; 2004, ch. 36, § 1; 2006, ch. 9, § 1, ch. 76, § 1; 2007, ch. 2, § 1; 2009, ch. 25, § 1; 2011, ch. 42, § 1; 2017 ch. 119, § 1, effective January 1, 2018; 2017 ch. 159, § 1, effective January 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 89, § 1, effective January 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 131, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 73, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2003 amendments. —

The first 2003 amendment, by ch. 71, § 1, effective July 1, 2003, inserted “23-2-201(f)” and made a related stylistic change in the introductory paragraph of (a).

The second 2003 amendment, by ch. 195, § 1, effective January 1, 2004, in (b), substituted “one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00)” for “seventy-five dollars ($75.00) in the first sentence, and added the second sentence, including (b)(i) and (ii).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in the section as set out above.

The 2004 amendment,

effective January 1, 2005, inserted references to the applicable fee under W.S.

23-1-701

in the introductory language in both (a) and (b).

The 2006 amendments. —

The first 2006 amendment, by ch. 9, § 1, inserted “the stamp or an authorization signifying purchase of the stamp shall be” in (a).

Laws 2006, ch. 9, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2006.

The second 2006 amendment, by ch. 76, § 1, effective August 1, 2006, in (a), substituted “licenses issued” for “pioneer licenses as defined,” inserted “23-2-201(g),” and make related changes.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2007 amendment,

effective January 1, 2008,
in (a), substituted “twelve dollars ($12.00)” for “ten dollars ($10.00)” in the introductory language, and substituted “Twenty-five percent (25%) of the revenues collected under this subsection” for “Two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50)” in (i); substituted “one hundred eighty dollars ($180.00)” for “one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00)” in (b).

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, in (a), substituted “subsections (b) and (c)” for “subsection (b)” in the first sentence, deleted “licenses issued under W.S. 23 1 705(d) and (e), of” after “Holders of” in the third sentence, and added “when exercising hunting or fishing privileges provided under those specific licenses” at the end of the third sentence; and added (c).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (c), inserted “or (k)” twice, and made related changes.

The 2017 amendments. —

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 119, § 1, effective January 1, 2018, in (a), added “and (ix)” in the second sentence; and made related changes.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 159, § 1, effective Jan. 1, 2018, in (b), substituted “one hundred eighty-five dollars ($185.00)” for “one hundred eighty dollars ($180.00).”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, in (a),
substituted “valid for the time period specified in commission
rules not to exceed twelve (12) months.
The stamp” for “valid
for one (1) calendar year and the stamp.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), added "23-1-302(q)."

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a) substituted “subsections (b), (c) and (d) of this section” for “subsections (b) and (c) of this section”; and added (d).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "twenty-one dollars ($21.00)" for "twelve dollars ($12.00)" in the first sentence of (a); and added (e).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1983, ch. 175, § 2, provides:

“(a) Any person may contribute to the enhancement of fish and wildlife habitat by purchasing a fish and wildlife habitat card. The card shall show the name of the purchaser and shall indicate the amount of the contribution by a letter designation on the card as follows:

“(i) Five dollars ($5.00) ‘C’ Card;

“(ii) Ten dollars ($10.00) ‘B’ Card;

“(iii) Twenty dollars ($20.00) ‘A’ Card;

“(iv) Fifty dollars ($50.00) or more ‘A’ Card.

“(b) Cards shall be approximately two and one-quarter (21/4) inches by three and one-quarter (31/4) inches in size. All proceeds from the voluntary purchase of such cards shall be transferred to the game and fish fund under W.S.

23-1-501

.”

Laws 2018, ch. 89, § 2, provides: “Licenses issued under title 23 of the Wyoming statutes before January 1, 2019, shall expire in accordance with the applicable provisions of law existing prior to amendment by this act.”

Cross references. —

As to a free sport fishing day, see §

23-2-209

.

§ 23-2-307.
Special
management permit.

The commission may by rule and regulation define those special management programs which require additional expenditures for the propagation, stocking or feeding of wildlife, for designated trophy management areas and for hunting and fishing field development. Any person participating in a special management program shall be required to purchase a special management permit for the program.

Special management permits may be purchased from the department or its authorized selling agents for fifteen dollars ($15.00) plus the applicable fee under W.S.

23-1-701

and, if issued on or after January 1, 2019, shall expire as provided in commission rules.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 121, § 1; 2004, ch. 36, § 1; 2007, ch. 2, § 1; 2017 ch. 159, § 1, effective January 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 89, § 1, effective January 1, 2019; 2018 ch. 89, § 1, effective January 1, 2019.

The 2004 amendment,

effective January 1, 2005, in (b) inserted “plus the applicable fee under W.S.

23-1-701

” following “ten dollars ($10.00).”

The 2007 amendment,

effective January 1, 2008,
substituted “twelve dollars ($12.00)” for “ten dollars ($10.00)” in (b).

The 2017 amendment,

effective Jan. 1, 2018, in (b), substituted “fifteen dollars ($15.00)” for “twelve dollars ($12.00).”

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, in (b), substituted “and, if issued on or after January 1, 2019, shall expire as provided in commission rules” for “and, shall be valid for one (1) calendar year.”

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2018, ch. 89, § 2, provides: “Licenses issued under title 23 of the Wyoming statutes before January 1, 2019, shall expire in accordance with the applicable provisions of law existing prior to amendment by this act.”